Delaware, session 153, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 6010, Title 7 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6010. Rules and regulations; plans. (a) The Secretary may adopt, amend, modify or repeal rules or regulations, or plans, after public hearing, to effectuate the policy and purposes of this chapter . , excepting any such rules and regulations associated with Regulatory Initiatives that limit sales of any motor vehicle currently permitted under the advanced Clean Car I regulations, adopted in 2014. No such rule or regulation shall extend, modify or conflict with any law of this State or the reasonable implications thereof.